District of Columbia statutes.
33-409

Repealed

Conveyance of real property of the partnership.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 638, Pub. L. 87-709, § 10
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-109.
1973 Ed., § 41-309.